Illinois, session 104th, HB238.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 705/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19.)